Massachusetts, session 194th, S740.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Section 71 of chapter 171 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022 Official Edition,
is hereby amended by inserting at the end of subsection (o) the following:-
"Notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, certificate of deposit interest
income earned at any Massachusetts bank as defined in chapter 167, shall not be subject to the
taxable income requirements of chapter 62."
of 1